hu: Főzőhőmérő kialakítása: Analóg; Digitális; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบเทอร์โมมิเตอร์วัดอุณหภูมิอาหาร: อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; อื่นๆ
nl: Ontwerp van kookthermometer: Analoog; Digitaal; Overig
fr: Type de thermomètre de cuisson: Analogique; Numérique; Autre
da: Design af madlavningstermometer: Analog; Digital; Andet
pt-BR: Design de termômetro de cozinha: Analógico; Digital; Outro
pl: Konstrukcja termometru kuchennego: Analogowy; Cyfrowy; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Zasnova kuhinjskega termometra: Analogno; Digitalno; Druga
zh-CN: 烹饪温度计设计: 指针式; 数字式; 其他
ja: 調理用温度計のデザイン: アナログ; デジタル; その他
it: Design del termometro da cucina: Analog; Digitale; Altro
zh-TW: 烹飪溫度計設計: 類比; 數位; 其他
sv: Design av matlagningstermometer: Analog; Digital; Övrigt
ru: Конструкция кулинарного термометра: Аналоговый; Цифровой; Другой
nb: Design av matlagingstermometer: Analog; Digital; Annet
fi: Ruoanlaittolämpömittarin suunnittelu: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Muu
bg-BG: Дизайн на термометъра за готвене: Аналогов; Дигитален; Друго
lt-LT: Maisto termometro dizainas: Analoginis; Skaitmeninis; Kita
cs: Provedení kuchyňského teploměru: Analogové; Digitální; Jiné
el: Σχεδιασμός θερμόμετρου μαγειρέματος: Αναλογικό; Ψηφιακό; Άλλο
de: Design für Kochthermometer: Analog; Digital; Sonstiges
es: Diseño de termómetro de cocina: Analógico; Digital; Otros
pt-PT: Design de termómetro de cozinha: Analógico; Digital; Outro
en: Cooking thermometer design: Analog; Digital; Other
sk-SK: Dizajn kuchynského teplomeru: Analógový; Digitálny; Iné
hr-HR: Dizajn kulinarskog termometra: Analogni; Digitalni; Ostalo
ko: 조리용 온도계 디자인: 아날로그; 디지털; 기타
ro-RO: Designul termometrului de gătit: Analogic; Digital; Altele
vi: Thiết kế nhiệt kế nấu ăn: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Khác
tr: Pişirme termometresi tasarımı: Analog; Dijital; Diğer